fr: Maison et jardin > Arts de la table et arts culinaires > Électroménager de cuisine > Grils électriques et grille-pains: Mini fours; Crêpières; Machines à donuts; Machines à muffins et cupcakes; Machines à pizza; Appareils à pizzelle; Machines à bretzels; Machines à paninis et croques; Grille-pains; Appareils à quesadillas et tortillas; Gaufriers
es: Casa y jardín > Cocina y comedor > Electrodomésticos de cocina > Tostadores y parrillas: Hornos tostadores; Máquinas para hacer crepes; Máquinas de donuts; Máquinas para hacer magdalenas; Aparatos para hacer pizza; Máquinas para hacer pizellas o ferratellas; Máquinas de pretzels; Sandwicheras; Tostadores; Máquinas para hacer quesadillas y tortillas; Gofreras
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Virtuvė ir valgomasis > Virtuvės prietaisai > Skrudintuvai ir kepsninės: Stalinės ir skrudinimo krosnelės; Lietinių gaminimo aparatai; Spurgų virimo aparatai; Mafinų ir keksiukų kepimo aparatai; Picų kepimo aparatai ir krosnys; Vaflinių sausainių kepimo aparatai; Riesčių kepimo aparatai; Sumuštinių keptuvės; Skrudintuvai; Tortilijų ir paplotėlių kepimo aparatai; Vaflių keptuvės
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 廚房與餐廳 > 廚房電器 > 烤麵包機和煎烤盤: 小烤箱; 可麗餅機; 甜甜圈機; 杯子蛋糕機; 披薩機/披薩烤箱; 義大利脆餅機; 椒鹽捲餅機; 三明治機; 烤麵包機; 墨西哥薄餅機; 格子鬆餅機
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Kuhinja in jedilnica > Kuhinjski aparati > Opekači kruha in žari: Namizne pečice in mini pečice; Aparati za izdelavo palačink; Naprave za peko krofov; Aparati za mafine in kolačke; Aparati in pečice za pico; Aparati za vaflje; Aparati za preste; Aparati za sendviče; Opekači kruha; Aparati za tortilje in ploščate kruhke; Pekači za vaflje
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Kuchyňa a jedáleň > Kuchynské spotrebiče > Hriankovače a grily: Rúry na pečenie s hriankovačom; Zariadenia na francúzske palacinky; Formy na šišky; Lis na muffiny a cupcaky; Pece na pizzu; Lis na oplátky; Lis na praclíky; Sendvičovače; Hriankovače; Lis na tortilly a plochý chlieb; Vaflovače
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Кухня и трапезария > Кухненски уреди > Тостери и грилове: Тостери и фурни за плот; Уреди за палачинки; Уреди за понички; Уреди за мъфини и кексчета; Машини и фурни за пица; Уреди за италиански вафлени сладки; Уреди за претцели; Уреди за сандвичи; Тостери; Уреди за тортила и плоски хлебчета; Гофретници
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Keittiö ja ruokailu > Keittiölaitteet > Leipägrillit ja grillit: Pöytäuunit; Crêpe-laitteet; Donitsikoneet; Muffini- ja kuppikakkukoneet; Pizzakoneet ja -uunit; Pizzellekoneet; Pretzel-koneet; Voileipäkoneet; Leivänpaahtimet; Tortilla- ja flatbread-koneet; Vohveliraudat
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > キッチン・ダイニング > キッチン家電 > トースター・グリル: オーブントースター; クレープメーカー; ドーナツメーカー; カップケーキメーカー; ピザメーカー・ピザオーブン; ピッツェルメーカー; プレッツェルメーカー; サンドイッチメーカー; トースター; トルティーヤメーカー; ワッフルメーカー
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 주방/식탁 > 주방가전 > 토스터/그릴: 조리대용 오븐/토스터 오븐; 크레페 메이커; 도넛 메이커; 머핀/컵케이크 메이커; 피자 메이커/오븐; 피젤 쿠키 메이커; 프레츨 메이커; 샌드위치 제조기; 토스터; 토르티야/플랫브레드 메이커; 와플기
pl: Dom i ogród > Kuchnia i jadalnia > Akcesoria kuchenne > Tostery i grille: Opiekacze; Naleśnikarki; Maszynki do pączków; Maszynki do muffinów i babeczek; Piecyki i piece do pizzy; Maszynki do pizzelle; Maszynki do precli; Maszynki do kanapek; Tostery; Maszynki do tortilli i pity; Waflownice
cs: Dům a zahrada > Kuchyně a jídelny > Kuchyňské spotřebiče > Topinkovače a grily: Opékací trouby; Palačinkovače; Přístroj na přípravu koblih; Přístroje na výrobu muffinů a koláčků; Domácí pece na pizzu; Lisy na pizzellu; Přístroj na přípravu preclíků; Sendvičovače; Topinkovače; Přístroje na výrobu tortill a quesadillas; Vaflovače
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Mutfak ve Yemek > Mutfak Aletleri > Tost Makineleri ve Izgaralar: Set Üstü ve Ekmek Kızartıcı Fırınlar; Krep Makineleri; Donut Makineleri; Mafin ve Fincan Keki Makineleri; Pizza Yapma Aletleri ve Fırınlar; Pizzelle Makineleri; Pretzel Makineleri; Sandviç Makineleri; Tost Makineleri; Tortilla ve Bazlama Makineleri; Waffle Izgaraları
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Kuhinja i blagovaonica > Kuhinjski aparati > Tosteri i roštilji: Stolne i toster pećnice; Uređaj za pravljenje palačinki; Pekači za krafne; Pekači za muffine i cupcake kolače; Pekači i pećnice za pizzu; Pekači za pizzele; Pekači za perece; Pekači za sendviče; Tosteri; Pekači za tortilje i pogače; Pekači za vafle
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Produtos de cozinha e aparelhos de jantar > Utensílios para cozinha > Torradeiras e grelhas: Fornos tostadores; Máquinas de crepe; Máquinas de donuts; Máquinas para fazer muffins e cupcakes; Máquinas de pizza; Máquinas para fazer pizza; Máquinas de pretzels; Sanduicheiras; Torradeiras; Formas para quesadillas e tortillas; Tostadores para waffles
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Cozinha e refeições > Eletrodomésticos de cozinha > Torradeiras e grelhadores: Minifornos/torradeiras de bancada; Crepeiras; Máquinas de donuts; Máquinas de muffins e cupcakes; Máquinas e fornos de pizza; Máquinas de pizzelle; Máquinas de pretzel; Sanduicheiras; Torradeiras; Máquinas de tortilha e pão achatado; Máquinas de waffles
de: Heim & Garten > Küche & Esszimmer > Küchengeräte > Toaster & Grills: Mini- & Toastöfen; Crêpes-Geräte; Donutmaker; Muffin- & Cupcake-Maker; Pizzaöfen; Pizzelle-Eisen; Brezelbackautomat; Sandwichtoaster; Toaster; Quesadilla- & Tortilla-Maker; Waffeleisen
hu: Otthon és kert > Konyha és étkező > Konyhai gépek > Kenyérpirítók és grillsütők: Munkalap- és kenyérpirító-sütők; Palacsintakészítők; Fánkkészítők; Muffin- és cupcake-készítők; Pizzakészítők és -sütők; Pizzelle-készítők; Pereckészítők; Szendvicssütők; Kenyérpirítók; Tortilla- és laposkenyér-készítők; Gofrisütők
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Κουζίνα & τραπεζαρία > Συσκευές κουζίνας > Φρυγανιέρες & γκριλ: Επιτραπέζιοι φούρνοι & φρυγανιέρες; Κρεπιέρες; Μηχανές για ντόνατ; Μηχανές για μάφιν & κεκάκια; Συσκευές παρασκευής πίτσας & φούρνοι; Συσκευές παρασκευής βάφλας (Pizzelle); Συσκευές παρασκευής πρέτσελ; Συσκευές παρασκευής σάντουιτς; Φρυγανιέρες; Συσκευές παρασκευής τορτίγιας & πίτας (Flatbread); Βαφλιέρες
th: บ้านและสวน > ห้องครัวและการรับประทานอาหาร > เครื่องใช้ในครัว > เครื่องปิ้งและเครื่องย่าง: เตาอบตั้งโต๊ะและเครื่องปิ้งขนมปัง; เครื่องทำเครป; เครื่องทําโดนัท; เครื่องทำมัฟฟินและคัพเค้ก; เครื่องทำและเตาอบพิซซ่า; เครื่องทำ Pizzelle; เครื่องทำเพรทเซิล; เครื่องทำแซนด์วิช; เครื่องปิ้งขนมปัง; เครื่องทำทอร์ทิล่าและแฟลตเบรด; เครื่องทำวาฟเฟิล
ru: Дом и сад > Кухня и сервировка стола > Кухонная техника > Тостеры и аппараты для выпекания: Печи-тостеры; Блинницы; Аппараты для приготовления пончиков; Аппараты для выпекания кексов и маффинов; Пицца-мейкеры и печи для пиццы; Вафельницы для пиццелли; Аппараты для выпекания кренделей; Бутербродницы; Тостеры; Аппараты для выпекания тортилий и лепешек; Вафельницы
en: Home & Garden > Kitchen & Dining > Kitchen Appliances > Toasters & Grills: Countertop & Toaster Ovens; Crêpe Makers; Donut Makers; Muffin & Cupcake Makers; Pizza Makers & Ovens; Pizzelle Makers; Pretzel Makers; Sandwich Makers; Toasters; Tortilla & Flatbread Makers; Waffle Irons
vi: Nhà và vườn > Phòng bếp và phòng ăn > Thiết bị nhà bếp > Lò nướng lửa trên và lò nướng lửa dưới: Bàn bếp và lò nước bánh mì; Máy làm bánh crêpe; Máy làm bánh donut; Máy làm bánh muffin và cupcake; Lò nướng và thiết bị làm bánh pizza; Máy làm bánh kẹp pizzelle; Dụng cụ làm bánh quy xoắn; Máy làm bánh kẹp thịt; Lò nướng bánh mì; Máy làm tortilla và bánh mì dẹt; Khuôn bánh quế
it: Casa e giardino > Cucina e pranzo > Elettrodomestici > Tostapane e griglie: Fornetti e scaldavivande; Makerper crepes; Macchine per donut; Piastre per muffin e tortine; Tegami per pizza; Piastre per pizzelle; Macchine per pretzel; Macchine per sandwich; Tostapane; Piastre per quesadilla e tortilla; Piastre waffle
da: Hjem og have > Køkken og spisestue > Køkkenudstyr > Brødristere og bordgriller: Toastmaskiner; Crêpemaskiner; Donutmaskiner; Muffin- og cupcakemaskiner; Pizzaovne; Vaffelmaskiner; Saltkringlemaskiner; Sandwichmaskiner; Brødristere; Tortilla- og fladbrødsmaskiner; Vaffeljern
sv: Hem och trädgård > Kök och matsal > Köksutrustning > Brödrostar och brödgrillar: Brödrostar och rostugnar; Crepesjärn; Munkmaskiner; Muffinsmaskiner; Pizzamaskiner och pizzaugnar; Pizzellemaskiner; Pretzelmaskiner; Smörgåsgrillar; Brödrostar; Tortilla- och tunnbrödsmaskiner; Våffeljärn
nl: Huis en tuin > Keuken en eetkamer > Keukenapparatuur > Broodroosters en tosti-apparaten: Toaster ovens; Crêpespannen; Donutmachines; Muffin- en cupcake-apparaten; Pizzamakers; Pizzelle-ijzers; Krakelingmachines; Tosti-ijzers; Broodroosters; Quesadilla- en tortilla-apparaten; Wafelijzers
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Bucătărie și sufragerie > Electrocasnice de bucătărie > Prăjitoare de pâine și grătare: Cuptoare de masă și cuptoare cu funcție de prăjire; Aparatele pentru clătite; Aparate pentru gogoși; Aparate pentru brioșe și prăjituri cupcake; Aparate pentru pizza și cuptoare pentru pizza; Aparate pentru pizzelle; Aparate pentru covrigi; Aparate pentru sandvișuri; Prăjitoare de pâine; Aparate pentru tortilla și lipii; Aparate pentru gofre
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 厨房/餐厅 > 厨房电器 > 烤面包机与烤肉架: 小型烤箱; 可丽饼机; 甜甜圈机; 松饼/纸杯蛋糕机; 披萨烤箱/饼铛; 意大利鸡蛋脆饼机; 椒盐脆饼机; 三明治机; 烤面包机; 饼铛; 华夫饼机
nb: Hjem og hage > Kjøkken og spiserom > Kjøkkenapparater > Brødristere og griller: Benk- og toastovner; Pannekakemaskiner; Donutmaskiner; Muffinsmaskiner; Pizzamaskiner og -ovner; Pizzellemaskiner; Pretzelmaskiner; Sandwichmaskiner; Brødristere; Tortilla- og flatbrødmaskiner; Vaffeljern